apertium-es-ro/apertium-es-ro.ro.dix
<pardef n="st/a__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
	  <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>au</l>
	  <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ai</l>
	  <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ă</l>
	  <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ăm</l>
	  <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ați</l>
	  <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>au</l>
	  <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e> 
        <p>          
	  <l>ăteam</l>
	  <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ăteai</l>
	  <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ătea</l>
	  <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e> 
        <p>          
	  <l>ăteam</l>
	  <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ăteați</l>
	  <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ăteau</l>
	  <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e> 
        <p>          
	  <l>ătusem</l>
	  <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pper"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ătuseși</l>
	  <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pper"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ătuse</l>
	  <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pper"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e> 
        <p>          
	  <l>ătusem</l>
	  <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pper"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ătuseți</l>
	  <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pper"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ătuseră</l>
	  <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pper"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>au</l>
	  <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ai</l>
	  <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ea</l>
	  <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ăm</l>
	  <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ați</l>
	  <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ea</l>
	  <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>at</l>
	  <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mn"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>at</l>
	  <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mn"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
	</p>
	<par n="S__aducând"/>
      </e>  
      
       <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ată</l>
	  <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ați</l>
	  <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ate</l>
	  <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="fn"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ându</l>
	  <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r>
	</p>
	<par n="S__aducându"/>
      </e>      
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>ând</l>
	  <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r>
	</p>
	<par n="S__aducând"/>
      </e>      
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>ând</l>
	  <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      	<p> 
	  <l>ai</l>
	  <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ea</l>
	  <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ăm</l>
	  <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      	<p> 
	  <l>ați</l>
	  <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e> 
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ea</l>
	  <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
   </pardef>

<e lm="sta">
        <i>st</i>
        <par n="st/a__vblex"/>
      </e>
    <e lm="da naștere">
        <i>d</i>
        <par n="st/a__vblex"/>
        <p>
	  <l><b/>naștere</l>
	  <r><g><b/>naștere</g></r>
	</p>
    </e>
    <e lm="da randament">
        <i>d</i>
        <par n="st/a__vblex"/>
        <p>
	  <l><b/>randament</l>
	  <r><g><b/>randament</g></r>
	</p>
    </e>
    <e lm="da socoteală">
        <i>d</i>
        <par n="st/a__vblex"/>
        <p>
	  <l><b/>socoteală</l>
	  <r><g><b/>socoteală</g></r>
	</p>
    </e>
    <e lm="da târcoale">
        <i>d</i>
        <par n="st/a__vblex"/>
        <p>
	  <l><b/>târcoale</l>
	  <r><g><b/>târcoale</g></r>
	</p>
    </e>
<e lm="sta pe vârful limbii" a="mioara">
        <i>st</i>
        <par n="st/a__vblex"/>
        <p>
	  <l><b/>pe<b/>vârful<b/>limbii</l>
	  <r><g><b/>pe<b/>vârful<b/>limbii</g></r>
	</p>
    </e>
<e lm="sta ca pe jar" a="mioara">
        <i>st</i>
        <par n="st/a__vblex"/>
        <p>
	  <l><b/>ca<b/>pe<b/>jar</l>
	  <r><g><b/>ca<b/>pe<b/>jar</g></r>
	</p>
    </e>
<e lm="sta în cumpănă" a="mioara" r="LR">
        <i>st</i>
        <par n="st/a__vblex"/>
        <p>
	  <l><b/>în<b/>cumpănă</l>
	  <r><g><b/>în<b/>cumpănă</g></r>
	</p>
    </e>
<e lm="sta ca pe jeratic" a="mioara" r="LR">
        <i>st</i>
        <par n="st/a__vblex"/>
        <p>
	  <l><b/>ca<b/>pe<b/>jeratic</l>
	  <r><g><b/>ca<b/>pe<b/>jeratic</g></r>
	</p>
    </e>
<e lm="sta ca pe jăratic" a="mioara" r="LR">
        <i>st</i>
        <par n="st/a__vblex"/>
        <p>
	  <l><b/>ca<b/>pe<b/>jăratic</l>
	  <r><g><b/>ca<b/>pe<b/>jăratic</g></r>
	</p>
    </e>
    <e lm="da înapoi" a="mioara" r="LR">
        <i>d</i>
        <par n="st/a__vblex"/>
        <p>
	  <l><b/>înapoi</l>
	  <r><g><b/>înapoi</g></r>
	</p>
    </e>
<e lm="da foc" a="mioara">
    <i>d</i>
        <par n="st/a__vblex"/>
        <p>
	  <l><b/>foc</l>
	  <r><g><b/>foc</g></r>
	</p>
    </e>
<e lm="da bătut" a="mioara">
    <i>d</i>
        <par n="st/a__vblex"/>
        <p>
	  <l><b/>bătut</l>
	  <r><g><b/>bătut</g></r>
	</p>
    </e>
<e lm="da greș" a="mioara" r="LR">
    <i>d</i>
        <par n="st/a__vblex"/>
        <p>
	  <l><b/>greș</l>
	  <r><g><b/>greș</g></r>
	</p>
    </e>
<e lm="da în clocot" a="mioara">
    <i>d</i>
        <par n="st/a__vblex"/>
        <p>
	  <l><b/>în<b/>clocot</l>
	  <r><g><b/>în<b/>clocot</g></r>
	</p>
    </e>
<e lm="da cu dobândă" a="mioara">
    <i>d</i>
        <par n="st/a__vblex"/>
        <p>
	  <l><b/>cu<b/>dobândă</l>
	  <r><g><b/>cu<b/>dobândă</g></r>
	</p>
    </e>
<e lm="da de bănuit" a="mioara">
    <i>d</i>
        <par n="st/a__vblex"/>
        <p>
	  <l><b/>de<b/>bănuit</l>
	  <r><g><b/>de<b/>bănuit</g></r>
	</p>
    </e>
<e lm="da pe brazdă" a="mioara">
    <i>d</i>
        <par n="st/a__vblex"/>
        <p>
	  <l><b/>pe<b/>brazdă</l>
	  <r><g><b/>pe<b/>brazdă</g></r>
	</p>
    </e>
<e lm="da binețe" a="mioara" r="LR">
    <i>d</i>
        <par n="st/a__vblex"/>
        <p>
	  <l><b/>binețe</l>
	  <r><g><b/>binețe</g></r>
	</p>
    </e>
<e lm="da zor" a="mioara">
    <i>d</i>
        <par n="st/a__vblex"/>
        <p>
	  <l><b/>zor</l>
	  <r><g><b/>zor</g></r>
	</p>
    </e>
    <e lm="da o sărutare">
        <i>d</i>
        <par n="st/a__vblex"/>
        <p>
	  <l><b/>o<b/>sărutare</l>
	  <r><g><b/>o<b/>sărutare</g></r>
	</p>
    </e>
<e lm="da un telefon" a="delia">
  <i>d</i>
  <par n="st/a__vblex"/>
  <p>
    <l><b/>un<b/>telefon</l>
    <r><g><b/>un<b/>telefon</g></r>
  </p>
</e>
<e lm="da un bip" a="delia">
  <i>d</i>
  <par n="st/a__vblex"/>
  <p>
    <l><b/>un<b/>bip</l>
    <r><g><b/>un<b/>bip</g></r>
  </p>
</e>
